Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.015

Purposes.

Corporations may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose including but not limited to mutual, social, cooperative, fraternal, beneficial, service, labor organization, and other purposes; but excluding purposes which by law are restricted to corporations organized under other statutes.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 3.]

NOTES:

Labor unions: Chapter 49.36 RCW.